Maine, session 132, LD167.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-ZZ, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 237, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Required reimbursement. The department shall provide reimbursement for a
hearing aid for one each hearing-impaired ear of an individual enrolled in the MaineCare
program in accordance with the following requirements:
A. The hearing loss must be documented by a primary care provider or an audiologist
licensed pursuant to Title 32, chapter 137;
B. The hearing aid must be provided by an audiologist or a hearing aid dealer licensed
pursuant to Title 32, chapter 137; and
C. The hearing loss must meet the requirements established by the department in rule
regarding the individual's severity of hearing loss.
The department shall provide reimbursement for a hearing aid for the 2nd hearing-impaired
ear of an individual enrolled in the MaineCare program if the individual meets requirements
established by the department by rule regarding the individual's severity of hearing loss,
enrollment in school, enrollment in vocational training, employment needs or the needs
identified by a primary care provider.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding for reimbursement for bilateral hearing aids for MaineCare
members with diagnosed hearing loss.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $102,946
Page 1 - 132LR0188(06)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $102,946
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $218,379
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $218,379
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 - 132LR0188(06)